Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-951
Mental health board hearings; closed to public; exception; where conducted.

All mental health board hearings under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act shall be closed to the public except at the request of the subject and shall be held in a courtroom or at any convenient and suitable place designated by the mental health board. The board shall have the right to conduct the proceeding where the subject is currently residing if the subject is unable to travel. Upon the agreement of all parties, any hearing before the mental health board may be conducted by videoconferencing.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 65;

Laws 2000, LB 884, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 83-1055;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 71;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 116.

Mental health board hearings are closed to the public except at the request of the subject. In re Interest of Michael M., 6 Neb. App. 560, 574 N.W.2d 774 (1998).